Hawaii statutes.
[§571-97] Delegation of the deployed
parent's contact rights to another. (a) Upon motion of the
deploying parent and consistent with the best interest of the child, including
safety considerations in cases involving a finding of domestic violence, the court
may delegate the deploying parent's parent-child contact rights, or a portion
thereof, to a family member, whether biological or by adoption, or to a person
to whom the deploying parent is married or with whom the deploying parent
cohabitates; provided that the family member or person has an existing close
and substantial relationship with the child.

(b) Any delegated parent-child contact under
this section shall not create separate rights of or standing to assert any
rights to parent-child contact or any other contact for the family member or
person. Any parent-child contact delegated under this section shall cease
pursuant to court order, upon the return of the deployed parent, or upon the
deployed parent's death. [L 2010, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next